Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.441, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Angling; disabled veterans. (a)new text begin Upon being furnished satisfactory evidence,new text end a person authorized to issue licenses must issue, without a fee,new text begin the following licenses to a resident who is a veteran, as defined in section 197.447, and who has a 100 percent service-connected disability, as defined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs:new text end new text begin (1)new text end a permanent license to take fish by angling deleted text begin to a resident who is a veteran, as defined in section 197.447, and that has a 100 percent service-connected disability as defined by the United States Veterans Administration upon being furnished satisfactory evidencedeleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) a license for a fish house, dark house, or shelternew text end . (b) A driver's license or Minnesota identification card bearing the designation under section 171.07, subdivision 15, paragraph (a), clause (2), serves as satisfactory evidence to obtain a license under this subdivision at all agent locations.